Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-148
County treasurer; reports to district board; contents.

The county treasurer shall report in writing on the second Monday in each month the amount of money in the county treasury, the amount of receipts for the month preceding, and the amount of money paid out. The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the board.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 23, p. 286;

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 6, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 3481;

Laws 1917, c. 84, § 1, p. 198;

C.S.1922, § 2881;

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 3, p. 251;

Laws 1929, c. 131, § 1, p. 482;

C.S.1929, § 46-126;

R.S.1943, § 46-148.